Hawaii statutes.
§490:10-103.1 Inconsistent laws. If
any other provision of law is inconsistent with this chapter, this chapter
shall govern unless this chapter or such inconsistent provision of law
specifically provides otherwise. [L 1965, c 208, §10-103.1; HRS §490:10-103.1]

Case Notes

Mentioned: 74 H. 1, 837 P.2d 1273.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next